Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-225
Department of Transportation; removal of nonconforming signs; program.

The Department of Transportation shall adopt future programs to assure that removal of directional signs, displays, or devices, providing directional information about goods and services in the interest of the traveling public, not otherwise exempted by economic hardship, be deferred until all other nonconforming signs, on a statewide basis, are removed.

Laws 1978, LB 534, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 39-1320.14;

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 19;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 106.